Massachusetts, session 194th, S2021.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 5 of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in line 11, the words “or Fifty-seventh” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- , Fifty-seventh, Fifty-ninth or Sixtieth.
SECTION 2. Said section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after clause Eighteenth the following clause:-
Eighteenth ½, In a city or town that accepts this clause, any portion of the estates of
persons who by reason of age, infirmity or poverty or financial hardship resulting from a change
to active military status, not including initial enlistment, are in the judgment of the assessors
unable to contribute fully toward the public charges.
of 3

SECTION 3. Said section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 486, the figure "10 " and inserting in place thereof the following
words:- 7.
SECTION 4. Clause Eighteenth A of said section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is
hereby amended by striking out the last paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following
paragraph:-
In addition to the remedies provided by this clause, the recorded statement of the
assessors provided for in this clause shall have the same force and effect as a valid taking for
nonpayment of taxes pursuant to section 53 of chapter 60, except that: (i) interest shall accrue at
the rate provided in subclause (1) until the conveyance of the property or the death of the person
whose taxes have been deferred, after which time interest shall accrue at the rate provided in
section 62 of said chapter 60 or at a lesser rate as may be determined by the legislative body of
the city or town, subject to its charter, not later than the beginning of the fiscal year to which the
tax relates; provided, however, that a city or town may also, by vote of its legislative body, allow
the interest to accrue at the rate provided in said subclause (1) for 1 year after the death of the
person whose taxes have been deferred; (ii) no assignment of the municipality’s interest under
this clause may be made pursuant to section 52 of said chapter 60; and (iii) a petition pursuant to
section 65 of said chapter 60 to foreclose the lien may be filed if at least 1 year has passed since
the conveyance of the property or the death of the person whose taxes have been deferred.
SECTION 5. Said section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by striking out, in line 1109, the word "ten" and inserting in place thereof the following
figure:- 7.
of 3

SECTION 6. Said section 5 of said chapter 59, as so appearing, is hereby further
amended by inserting after the word “household”, in line 1124, the following words:- or $80,000,
whichever is greater. .
SECTION 7. Said clause Forty-first A of said section 5 of said chapter 59, as so
appearing, is hereby further amended by striking out the last paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph:-
In addition to the remedies provided by this clause, the recorded statement of the
assessors provided for in this clause shall have the same force and effect as a valid taking for
nonpayment of taxes pursuant to section 53 of chapter 60, except that: (i) interest shall accrue at
the rate provided in subclause (1) of the third paragraph until the conveyance of the property or
the death of the person whose taxes have been deferred, after which time interest shall accrue at
the rate provided in section 62 of said chapter 60 or at a lesser rate as may be determined by the
legislative body of the city or town, subject to its charter, not later than the beginning of the
fiscal year to which the tax relates; provided, however, that a city or town may also, by vote of
its legislative body, allow the interest to accrue at the rate provided in said subclause (1) of the
third paragraph for 1 year after the death of the person whose taxes have been deferred; (ii) no
assignment of the municipality’s interest pursuant to this clause may be made pursuant to section
52 of chapter 60; and (iii) a petition pursuant to section 65 of chapter 60 to foreclose the lien may
be filed if at least 1 year has passed since the conveyance of the property or the death of the
person whose taxes have been deferred.
of 3